Utah statutes.
58-57-7.   Exemptions from licensure.

(1) (a)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(b), "qualified" means an individual who is a registered polysomnographic technologist or a Diplomate certified by the American Board of Sleep Medicine.

(b)  For purposes of Subsections (2)(f) and (g), "supervision" means one of the following will be immediately available for consultation in person or by phone:

(i)  a practitioner;

(ii)  a respiratory therapist;

(iii)  a Diplomate of the American Board of Sleep Medicine; or

(iv)  a registered polysomnographic technologist.

(2)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following persons may engage in the practice of respiratory therapy subject to the stated circumstances and limitations without being licensed under this chapter:

(a)  any person who provides gratuitous care for a member of his immediate family without representing himself as a licensed respiratory care practitioner;

(b)  any person who is a licensed or qualified member of another health care profession, if this practice is consistent with the accepted standards of the profession and if the person does not represent himself as a respiratory care practitioner;

(c)  any person who serves in the Armed Forces of the United States or any other agency of the federal government and is engaged in the performance of his official duties;

(d)  any person who acts under a certification issued pursuant to Title 26, Chapter 8a, Utah Emergency Medical Services System Act, while providing emergency medical services;

(e)  any person who delivers, installs, or maintains respiratory related durable medical equipment and who gives instructions regarding the use of that equipment in accordance with Subsections 58-57-2(3) and (6), except that this exemption does not include any clinical evaluation or treatment of the patient;

(f)  any person who is working in a practitioner's office, acting under supervision; and

(g)  a polysomnographic technician or trainee, acting under supervision, as long as the technician or trainee administers the following only in a sleep lab, sleep center, or sleep facility:

(i)  oxygen titration; and

(ii)  positive airway pressure that does not include mechanical ventilation.

(3)  Nothing in this chapter permits a respiratory care practitioner to engage in the unauthorized practice of other health disciplines.

